Wyoming, session 2025, SF0054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-702(a)(intro), 15-7-101(a)(v),
15-7-111 by creating a new subsection (c),
37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) and 37-16-101(a)(ii) are amended to
read:

SF0054

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0027
15-1-702. Powers of municipalities and counties;
limitations.

(a) Nothing in this article is intended, nor shall
operate, to limit or restrict any governing body from
carrying out its purposes and objectives through the
exercise of powers otherwise granted by law. In addition to
all other powers each municipality, county, and
multi-county joint powers board has without any other
authority the power to:

15-7-101. Purposes.

(a) In addition to all other powers provided by law,
any city or town may make public improvements as follows
for which bonds may be issued to the contractor or be sold
as provided in this chapter to:

(v) Establish, construct, maintain and regulate
electric light plants, and electric power plants to supply
the inhabitants with electric lights and power, to light
the streets, highways and public buildings, and supply
SF0054

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0027
power for water works and other municipally owned works and
utilities electricity generation facilities;

15-7-111. Bonds for municipal improvements;
exception; procedure.

(c) In addition to all other powers provide by law
and notwithstanding the municipal improvements authorized
under subsection (a) of this section, any city or town may
issue and sell revenue bonds for the purpose of creating,
constructing, maintaining, expanding or improving
electrical systems and any facilities located or to be
located on property owned by a city or town for the
wholesale generation, transmission or distribution of
electrical energy. A city or town shall only operate
electrical systems for wholesale energy production subject
to agreement with the public utility that has the city or
town or a portion of the city or town within the
certificated service territory of the public utility. No
revenue bonds shall be issued or sold for the purpose of
purchasing or in any manner acquiring the ownership of an
existing electrical system.

SF0054

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0027
37-1-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in chapters 1, 2, 3, 12, 17 and 18 of
this title:

(vi) "Public utility" means and includes every
person that owns, operates, leases, controls or has power
to operate, lease or control:

(H) None of the provisions of this chapter
shall apply to:

(II) Public utilities owned and
operated by a municipality selling electricity at wholesale
pursuant to a commission regulated agreement with a public
utility as provided in W.S. 15-7-111(c) or to public
utilities owned and operated by a municipality of the state
of Wyoming or owned and operated by a joint powers entity
formed pursuant to the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, W.S.
16-1-102 through 16-1-110, and comprised of two (2) or more
municipalities, except as to that portion of a municipality
owned and operated public utility or joint powers entity
owned and operated public utility, if any, as may extend
SF0054

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0027
services outside the corporate limits of a municipality and
except that if any municipal or joint powers utility owns
an undivided interest in a facility for the production of
electricity which is also partly owned by an agency subject
to the jurisdiction of the public service commission, the
sale of electricity in excess of the participating
municipalities' or joint powers entities' need is subject
to this act;

37-16-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter unless the context or a
specific article otherwise requires:

(ii) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net
metering system. "Customer-generator" shall not include a
municipality operating electrical systems for wholesale
energy production pursuant to an agreement with a public
utility as provided in W.S. 15-7-111(c);

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0054